Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-291
Removal of directors by shareholders.

(MBCA 8.08) (a) The shareholders
may remove one or more directors with or without cause unless the articles
of incorporation provide that directors may be removed only for cause.

(b) If a director is
elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the shareholders of that voting
group may participate in the vote to remove that director.

(c) A director may not
be removed if the number of votes sufficient to elect the director under cumulative
voting is voted against removal.

(d) A director may be removed by the shareholders
only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing the director and the
meeting notice must state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the
meeting is removal of the director.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 91.
January 1, 2017